Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT TO FUND HOUSING INITIATIVES Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article XI to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 16. new text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2027, until June 30, 2052, the sales and use tax rate shall be increased by three-eighths of one percent on sales and uses taxable under the general sales and use tax law. Receipts from the increase, plus penalties and interest and reduced by any refunds, are dedicated, for the benefit of Minnesotans, to the following funds: 25 percent to the homeownership opportunity fund, which may be spent to assist in the creation, purchase, and rehabilitation of homes for owner occupancy; 25 percent to the community and household stability fund, which may be used to assist in providing emergency financial assistance, legal services, educational services, and outreach services to persons who are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless; and 50 percent to the rental opportunity fund, which may be used to assist in funding ongoing rental assistance and supportive services for renters and in the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or adaptive reuse of rental housing. A homeownership opportunity fund, a community and household stability fund, and a rental opportunity fund are created in the state treasury. The money dedicated under this section shall be appropriated by law. The dedicated money under this section must supplement traditional sources of funding for these purposes and may not be used as a substitute. The dedicated money under this section may be used to provide matching grants. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to remove barriers to homeownership, to make rental housing safe and affordable, and to protect vulnerable households and communities from displacement and homelessness by increasing the sales and use tax rate beginning July 1, 2027, by three-eighths of one percent on taxable sales until the year 2052? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) The title required under Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, for the question submitted to the people under paragraph (a) shall be: "Creation of Homeownership Opportunity Fund, Community and Household Stability Fund, and Rental Opportunity Fund." new text end ARTICLE 2 STATUTORY CHANGES Section 1. new text begin [256K.50] COMMUNITY AND HOUSEHOLD STABILITY FUND. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Fund. new text end new text begin The community and household stability fund is established in the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 16. All money earned by the fund must be credited to the fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The fund is established to help Minnesotans improve the condition of homes and communities and prevent homelessness and displacement from homes. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Expenditures. new text end new text begin Subject to appropriation, receipts in the fund may be spent for: new text end new text begin (1) emergency assistance for households or individuals that are homeless or at risk of homelessness or displacement; new text end new text begin (2) legal services for households or individuals that are homeless or at risk of homelessness or displacement; new text end new text begin (3) outreach services for households or individuals that are homeless or at risk of homelessness or displacement; new text end new text begin (4) funding the operation of emergency shelters; and new text end new text begin (5) financing the acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of property to serve as emergency shelter, transitional housing, or permanent supportive housing. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Audit. new text end new text begin As resources allow, the legislative auditor shall audit fund expenditures to ensure that the money is spent for the purposes for which it is constitutionally dedicated and for which the money was appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prevailing wages. new text end new text begin Contracts for projects funded by this fund must meet the requirements of contracts for state projects, as established in section 177.43. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [256K.51] COMMUNITY AND HOUSEHOLD STABILITY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A Community and Household Stability Council is created to advise on the administration and implementation of the community and household stability fund under section 256K.50. The Housing Finance Agency shall provide administrative support for the council. The members of the council shall elect a chair from the voting members of the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; appointment. new text end new text begin (a) Three members of the house of representatives, including two members from the majority party, appointed by the speaker of the house, and one member from the minority party, appointed by the minority leader, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. Three members of the senate, including two members from the majority party and one member from the minority party, appointed according to the rules of the senate, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. new text end new text begin (b) Twenty-four voting members shall be appointed and must include: new text end new text begin (1) one representative of a labor union; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (3) four representatives of organizations that work directly with under-resourced or underrepresented communities; new text end new text begin (4) four members who receive or previously received support services, emergency rental assistance, or homeless prevention services; new text end new text begin (5) two members representing a Tribal government; new text end new text begin (6) one member elected to or appointed by the governing body of a local government; new text end new text begin (7) one member that represents either a public housing authority or a housing and redevelopment authority; and new text end new text begin (8) one member representing the Council on Disability. new text end new text begin (c) Appointments shall be made as follows: the governor, the senate majority leader, and the speaker of the house shall each in turn appoint members required under paragraph (b) until 12 appointments have been made. The governor shall appoint an additional eight members, ensuring that any outstanding requirements under paragraph (b) are satisfied. The house minority leader and the senate minority leader shall then each appoint two members. Members appointed under this paragraph must not be registered lobbyists or legislators. new text end new text begin (d) Appointing authorities shall ensure that appointees represent a diversity of backgrounds, including racial, ethnic, socioeconomic, and geographic backgrounds. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Conflict of interest. new text end new text begin A council member may not participate in or vote on a decision of the council relating to an organization in which the member has either a direct or indirect personal financial interest. While serving on the council, a member shall avoid any potential conflict of interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Terms; compensation; removal. new text end new text begin The terms of members representing the state agencies are four years and are coterminous with the governor. The terms of other nonlegislative members of the council shall be as provided in section 15.059, subdivision 2. Members may serve until their successors are appointed and qualify. Compensation and removal of nonlegislative council members is as provided in section 15.059, subdivisions 3 and 4. Compensation of legislative members is as determined by the appointing authority. The Department of Human Services may reimburse legislative members for expenses. A vacancy on the council may be filled by the appointing authority provided in subdivision 2 for the remainder of the unexpired term. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Strategic plan. new text end new text begin The council shall adopt a strategic plan for recommending policy changes and making expenditures from the community and household stability fund that further the purpose in section 256K.50, subdivision 2, including identifying the priority areas for funding for the next six years. The council shall issue a revised plan by December 1 each even-numbered year. The strategic plan must have clearly stated short- and long-term goals and strategies for fund expenditures, must provide measurable outcomes for expenditures, and must determine areas of emphasis for funding. The council's strategic plan must detail how the council will engage impacted individuals and communities and ensure council recommendations support the fund's purpose and the intention to reduce disparities, support community-based solutions, improve the condition of homes, increase accessibility, and improve energy and water efficiency. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Recommended appropriations. new text end new text begin The Community and Household Stability Council shall recommend to the governor and the legislature the manner in which money from the community and household stability fund should be appropriated for the purposes stated in section 256K.50 and the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 16. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports to legislature. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the council must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing, homelessness, and taxes on the activities for which money has been or will be spent for the current biennium and the activities for which money is recommended to be spent in the next biennium. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15 of each even-numbered year, the council may submit to the legislature supplemental recommendations on the manner in which money from the community and household stability fund should be appropriated in the next fiscal year. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [462A.51] HOMEOWNERSHIP OPPORTUNITY FUND. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Fund. new text end new text begin The homeownership opportunity fund is established in the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 16. All money earned by the fund must be credited to the fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The fund is established to support Minnesotans and the communities in which they live, to eliminate racial disparities in homeownership, to ensure Minnesotans can accumulate wealth and assets, and to increase quality of life by helping more first-time home buyers afford and access homeownership. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Expenditures. new text end new text begin Subject to appropriation, receipts in the fund may be spent for: new text end new text begin (1) financing the acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of property to serve as owner-occupied housing, including single-family housing, multifamily housing containing up to four units, housing on land leased by a community land trust, condominiums, and cooperatively owned housing, including cooperatively owned manufactured home parks; new text end new text begin (2) financing the conversion of rental property into owner-occupied property, including cooperatively owned housing and cooperatively owned manufactured home parks; new text end new text begin (2) down payment assistance; new text end new text begin (3) accessibility grants and loans for owner-occupied housing; new text end new text begin (4) financial assistance to borrowers who are delinquent on mortgage or contract for deed payments; and new text end new text begin (5) homeownership education, counseling, and training under section 462A.209. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Audit. new text end new text begin As resources allow, the legislative auditor shall audit fund expenditures to ensure that the money is spent for the purposes for which it is constitutionally dedicated and for which the money was appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prevailing wages. new text end new text begin Contracts for projects funded by this fund must meet the requirements of contracts for state projects, as established in section 177.43. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [462A.52] HOMEOWNERSHIP OPPORTUNITY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A Homeownership Opportunity Council is created to advise on the administration and implementation of the homeownership opportunity fund under section 462A.51. The Housing Finance Agency shall provide administrative support for the council. The members of the council shall elect a chair from the voting members of the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; appointment. new text end new text begin (a) Three members of the house of representatives, including two members from the majority party, appointed by the speaker of the house, and one member from the minority party, appointed by the minority leader, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. Three members of the senate, including two members from the majority party and one member from the minority party, appointed according to the rules of the senate, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. new text end new text begin (b) Twenty-four voting members shall be appointed and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (2) one member that represents either a public housing authority or a housing and redevelopment authority; new text end new text begin (3) one representative of a labor union; new text end new text begin (4) two members who purchased a Habitat for Humanity home; new text end new text begin (5) two members who purchased a community land trust home; new text end new text begin (6) two members who have been or are manufactured home park residents; new text end new text begin (7) two members who live in a cooperatively owned property; new text end new text begin (8) two representatives of organizations focused on producing new affordable homes for ownership; new text end new text begin (9) one representative of an organization that provides down payment assistance or home buyer preparation services to low-income households; new text end new text begin (10) two representatives of organizations that work directly with households on the path to homeownership; new text end new text begin (11) one member elected to or appointed by the governing body of a local government; new text end new text begin (12) two representatives of a Tribal government; new text end new text begin (13) one person with a disability or one disability advocate; and new text end new text begin (14) one person with practical experience or expertise with both housing and either energy or climate. new text end new text begin (c) Appointments shall be made as follows: the governor, the senate majority leader, and the speaker of the house shall each in turn appoint members required under paragraph (b) until 12 appointments have been made. The governor shall appoint an additional eight members, ensuring that any outstanding requirements under paragraph (b) are satisfied. The house minority leader and the senate minority leader shall then each appoint two members. Members appointed under this paragraph must not be registered lobbyists or legislators. new text end new text begin (d) Appointing authorities shall ensure that appointees represent a diversity of backgrounds, including racial, ethnic, socioeconomic, and geographic backgrounds. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Conflict of interest. new text end new text begin A council member may not participate in or vote on a decision of the council relating to an organization in which the member has either a direct or indirect personal financial interest. While serving on the council, a member shall avoid any potential conflict of interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Terms; compensation; removal. new text end new text begin The terms of members representing the state agencies are four years and are coterminous with the governor. The terms of other nonlegislative members of the council shall be as provided in section 15.059, subdivision 2. Members may serve until their successors are appointed and qualify. Compensation and removal of nonlegislative council members is as provided in section 15.059, subdivisions 3 and 4. Compensation of legislative members is as determined by the appointing authority. The agency may reimburse legislative members for expenses. A vacancy on the council may be filled by the appointing authority provided in subdivision 2 for the remainder of the unexpired term. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Strategic plan. new text end new text begin The council shall adopt a strategic plan for recommending policy changes and making expenditures from the homeownership opportunity fund that further the purpose in section 462A.51, subdivision 2, including identifying the priority areas for funding for the next six years. The council shall issue a revised plan by December 1 of each even-numbered year. The strategic plan must have clearly stated short- and long-term goals and strategies for fund expenditures, must provide measurable outcomes for expenditures, and must determine areas of emphasis for funding. The council's strategic plan must detail how the council will engage impacted individuals and communities and ensure council recommendations support the fund's purpose and the intention to reduce disparities, support community-based solutions, improve the condition of homes, increase accessibility, and improve energy and water efficiency. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Recommended appropriations. new text end new text begin The Homeownership Opportunity Council shall recommend to the governor and the legislature the manner in which money from the homeownership opportunity fund should be appropriated for the purposes stated in section 462A.51 and the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 16. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports to legislature. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the council must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing and jurisdiction over taxes on the activities for which money has been or will be spent for the current biennium and the activities for which money is recommended to be spent in the next biennium. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15 of each even-numbered year, the council may submit to the legislature supplemental recommendations on the manner in which money from the homeownership opportunity fund should be appropriated in the next fiscal year. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [462A.53] RENTAL OPPORTUNITY FUND. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Fund. new text end new text begin The rental opportunity fund is established in the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 16. All money earned by the fund must be credited to the fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The fund is established to create more homes that Minnesotans can afford by increasing the supply of affordable rental housing, especially for very low- and extremely low-income households; reduce the number of low-income households experiencing housing cost burden by investing in rental assistance; and improve quality of life by ensuring existing homes are safe, healthy, and resilient. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Expenditures. new text end new text begin Subject to appropriation, receipts in the fund must be spent for: new text end new text begin (1) financing the acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of property to serve as rental housing; new text end new text begin (2) rental assistance; and new text end new text begin (3) supportive services to renters and owners of rental property. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Audit. new text end new text begin As resources allow, the legislative auditor shall audit fund expenditures to ensure that the money is spent for the purposes for which it is constitutionally dedicated and for which the money was appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prevailing wages. new text end new text begin Contracts for projects funded by this fund must meet the requirements of contracts for state projects, as established in section 177.43. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [462A.54] RENTAL OPPORTUNITY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A Rental Opportunity Council is created to advise on the administration and implementation of the rental opportunity fund under section 462A.53. The Housing Finance Agency shall provide administrative support for the council. The members of the council shall elect a chair from the voting members of the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; appointment. new text end new text begin (a) Three members of the house of representatives, including two members from the majority party, appointed by the speaker of the house, and one member from the minority party, appointed by the minority leader, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. Three members of the senate, including two members from the majority party and one member from the minority party, appointed according to the rules of the senate, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority as nonvoting members of the council. new text end new text begin (b) Twenty-four voting members shall be appointed and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (2) one representative of a labor union; new text end new text begin (3) one member that represents either a public housing authority or a housing or redevelopment authority; new text end new text begin (4) one member living in rental housing who (i) has a disability, and (ii) transitioned out of congregate care; new text end new text begin (5) one member who is experiencing or has experienced homelessness; new text end new text begin (6) two representatives of a Tribal government; new text end new text begin (7) one representative of a nonprofit housing provider; new text end new text begin (8) one representative of a for-profit housing provider; new text end new text begin (9) one representative of a nonprofit developer of rental housing; and new text end new text begin (10) one representative of a for-profit developer of rental housing. new text end new text begin (c) Appointments shall be made as follows: the governor, the senate majority leader, and the speaker of the house shall each in turn appoint members required under paragraph (b) until 12 appointments have been made. The governor shall appoint an additional eight members, ensuring that any outstanding requirements under paragraph (b) are satisfied. The house minority leader and the senate minority leader shall then each appoint two members. Members appointed under this paragraph must not be registered lobbyists or legislators. new text end new text begin (d) Appointing authorities shall ensure that appointees represent a diversity of backgrounds, including racial, ethnic, socioeconomic, and geographic backgrounds. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Conflict of interest. new text end new text begin A council member may not participate in or vote on a decision of the council relating to an organization in which the member has either a direct or indirect personal financial interest. While serving on the council, a member shall avoid any potential conflict of interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Terms; compensation; removal. new text end new text begin The terms of members representing the state agencies are four years and are coterminous with the governor. The terms of other nonlegislative members of the council shall be as provided in section 15.059, subdivision 2. Members may serve until their successors are appointed and qualify. Compensation and removal of nonlegislative council members is as provided in section 15.059, subdivisions 3 and 4. Compensation of legislative members is as determined by the appointing authority. The agency may reimburse legislative members for expenses. A vacancy on the council may be filled by the appointing authority provided in subdivision 2 for the remainder of the unexpired term. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Strategic plan. new text end new text begin The council shall adopt a strategic plan for recommending policy changes and making expenditures from the rental opportunity fund that further the purpose in section 462A.53, subdivision 2, including identifying the priority areas for funding for the next six years. The council shall issue a revised plan by December 1 each even-numbered year. The strategic plan must have clearly stated short- and long-term goals and strategies for fund expenditures, must provide measurable outcomes for expenditures, and must determine areas of emphasis for funding. The council's strategic plan must detail how the council will engage impacted individuals and communities and ensure council recommendations support the fund's purpose and the intention to reduce disparities, support community-based solutions, improve the condition of homes, increase accessibility, and improve energy and water efficiency. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Recommended appropriations. new text end new text begin The Rental Opportunity Council shall recommend to the governor and the legislature the manner in which money from the rental opportunity fund should be appropriated for the purposes stated in section 462A.53 and the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 16. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports to legislature. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the council must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing and jurisdiction over taxes on the activities for which money has been or will be spent for the current biennium and the activities for which money is recommended to be spent in the next biennium. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15 of each even-numbered year, the council may submit to the legislature supplemental recommendations on the manner in which money from the rental opportunity fund should be appropriated in the next fiscal year. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective July 1, 2027, if the constitutional amendment proposed in article 1, section 1, is adopted by the voters. new text end